test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IS_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kíl is - ENGLISH : # CLASS_IS_STEM_1

     kíl is+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kíl is
     kíl is+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is
     kíl is+V+RELATIVE: kíl iss
     kíl is+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kíl isäsáa
     kíl is+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kíl isäs
     kíl is+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kíl isäsáang
     kíl is+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kíl isäsga
     kíl is+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kíl isäsáas
     kíl is+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl isäsáa.ang
     kíl is+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'úuj
     kíl is+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'úujang
     kíl is+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kíl isäsáa'uujang
     kíl is+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kíl is'us
     kíl is+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'ujáa
     kíl is+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'úujaangaa
     kíl is+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kíl isäsáa'us
     kíl is+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kíl isäsáa'ahlans
     kíl is+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kíl isäséehl
     kíl is+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kíl is'úu
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'wáa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'wáa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'wáang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kíl is'wägán
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'áawaa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kíl is'áawaan
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kíl is'wáas
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kíl is'áawaas
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'wáa.ang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'áawaa.ang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'wägíinii
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'wägáangaa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'wägáangaan
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kíl is'wáaäsaa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kíl is'wáaäs
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kíl is'wáaäsaang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kíl is'wáaäsga
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'wáaäsaas
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'wáaäsaa.ang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'wáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'wáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'wáa'uuj
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'wáa'uujang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kíl is'wáaäsaa'uujang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kíl is'wáa'us
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'wáa'ujaa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'wáa'uujaangaa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'wáaäsaa'us
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kíl is'wáa'ahlanggang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kíl is'wáa'ahlanggan
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kíl is'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kíl is'wáa'ahlans
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kíl is'áawaa'ahlang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kíl is'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kíl is'áawaa'ahlanggang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kíl is'wáa'ahl
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kíl is'wáaäseehl
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kíl is'áng
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'ángga
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'ánggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: kíl is'ánggan
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'áangaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: kíl is'áangaan
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: kíl is'áns
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kíl is'áangaas
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'angáng
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'áangaa.ang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl is'ánggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ánggiinii
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ánggaangaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ánggaangaan
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kíl is'ángäsaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kíl is'ángäs
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kíl is'ángäsaang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kíl is'ángäsga
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'ángäsaas
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'ángäsaa.ang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'uuj
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'uujang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kíl is'ángäsaa'uujang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'us
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'áng'ujaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'áng'uujaangaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'ángäsaa'us
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kíl is'áang'ahlanggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: kíl is'áang'ahlanggan
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'áang'ahlanggiinii
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kíl is'ángäsaa'ahlans
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kíl is'áang'ahlans
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: kíl is'áangaa'ahlang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kíl is'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kíl is'áangaa'ahlanggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: kíl is'áang'ahl
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kíl is'ángäseehl
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kíl is'áng'uu
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'waa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'waa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'waang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kíl is'áng'wägan
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'áng'aawaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kíl is'áng'aawaan
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kíl is'áng'waas
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kíl is'áng'aawaas
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'áng'waa.ang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'áng'aawaa.ang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'áng'wägiinii
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'áng'wägaangaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'áng'wägaangaan
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kíl is'áng'waaäsaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kíl is'áng'waaäs
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kíl is'áng'waaäsaang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kíl is'áng'waaäsga
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'áng'waaäsaas
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'wáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'wáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'waa'uuj
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'waa'uujang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kíl is'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'waa'us
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'áng'waa'ujaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'áng'waaäsaa'us
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kíl is'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kíl is'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kíl is'áng'waa'ahlans
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kíl is'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kíl is'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kíl is'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kíl is'áng'waa'ahl
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kíl is'áng'waaäseehl
